Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3168.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 15.0145, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 7a. new text end new text begin Alternate pool of members for ethnic councils. new text end new text begin (a) The Minnesota Council on Latino Affairs, the Council for Minnesotans of African Heritage, and the Council on Asian-Pacific Minnesotans shall each establish a pool of alternate members to ensure full participation in all council meetings and activities. For every council seat filled by a regular council member, two alternate members shall be appointed, resulting in a two-to-one alternate-to-member ratio. The alternate pool of members shall serve as a reserve to ensure a quorum is present and that there is active participation in the councils' business in the absence of regular council members. new text end new text begin (b) The governor shall appoint alternate members to each council in the same manner as regular council members, ensuring that alternate members meet the same eligibility and diversity criteria in subdivision 2. Alternate members must represent the demographic composition of the communities served by their respective councils, as determined by the state demographer. The governor must prioritize individuals with relevant expertise in public policy, legal affairs, social work, business, or management. new text end new text begin (c) The terms of service and rotation for alternate members are: new text end new text begin (1) alternate members shall serve the same term lengths as regular council members, under section 15.059. Alternate members may serve no more than a total of eight years on any of the ethnic councils; new text end new text begin (2) alternate members shall be rotated into active council service whenever a regular member is absent, has vacated their seat, or is otherwise unable to fulfill their duties; and new text end new text begin (3) when filling in for a regular member, the alternate member assumes full voting rights and responsibilities for the duration of the absence. new text end new text begin (d) The terms for activation and participation are: new text end new text begin (1) if a regular member is unable to attend a meeting or perform their duties, the chair of the respective council shall notify the alternate member pool and an alternate member shall be selected on a rotating basis to fill the vacant seat; new text end new text begin (2) alternate members must complete the same orientation and training as regular council members to ensure they are prepared to assume full responsibilities when activated; and new text end new text begin (3) alternate members are encouraged to attend all council meetings as non-voting participants when not filling in for a regular member. This allows them to stay informed and engaged in council activities. new text end new text begin (e) If a regular member's seat becomes vacant due to resignation, removal, or the end of their term, an alternate member shall be temporarily elevated to full membership with voting rights until a new appointment is made by the governor. new text end new text begin (f) The councils shall track the attendance and participation of both regular and alternate members. Alternate members who consistently fail to attend meetings or fulfill their duties may be removed from the alternate pool by the governor. Regular members who miss more than half of the scheduled council meetings within a 12-month period shall be automatically replaced by an alternate member from the alternate pool pending the governor's approval of the replacement. new text end new text begin (g) For the purposes of establishing a quorum, alternate members filling in for regular members shall be counted as voting members. Alternate members may only vote when actively filling in for an absent or vacant member. new text end new text begin (h) Each council shall submit an annual report to the governor and the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over state government detailing the use of alternate members including their participation, performance, and the impact on the council's ability to maintain a quorum and fulfill the council's statutory duties. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end